District of Columbia statutes.
16-533

Attachment proceedings in Superior Court.

The provisions of this Code relating to attachments apply to attachment proceedings in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 555, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(b)(3)(A)

History

1981 Ed., § 16-533.
1973 Ed., § 16-533.

Prior Codifications